District of Columbia statutes.
22-3203

Consecutive sentences.

(a)

A person may be convicted of any combination of theft, identity theft, fraud, credit card fraud, unauthorized use of a vehicle, commercial piracy, and receiving stolen property for the same act or course of conduct; provided, that no person shall be consecutively sentenced for any such combination or combinations that arise from the same act or course of conduct.

(b)

Convictions arising out of the same act or course of conduct shall be considered as one conviction for purposes of any application of repeat offender sentencing provisions.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 103, 29 DCR 3976
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 12(a), 44 DCR 1408
Mar. 27, 2004, D.C. Law 15-106, § 2(b), 50 DCR 9809
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 214(b), 56 DCR 7413
Commercial piracy, see § 22-3214.
Fraud, see § 22-3221.
Theft, see § 22-3811.
Unauthorized use of motor vehicles, see § 22-3215.
1981 Ed., § 22-3803.
D.C. Law 15-106 made nonsubstantive changes in pars. (2) and (3); and added pars. (4) and (5).
D.C. Law 18-88 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Identity Theft Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-285, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 204).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Identity Thief Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-388, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3382).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(b) of Crime Bill Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-129, June 29, 2009, 56 DCR 5495).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(b) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(b) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).